Washington statutes.
RCW 28C.04.530

Washington award for vocational excellence—Board's duties.

(1) The workforce training and education coordinating board shall have the responsibility for the development and administration of the Washington award for vocational excellence program. The workforce training and education coordinating board shall develop the program in consultation with other state agencies and private organizations having interest and responsibility in vocational education, including but not limited to: The state board for community and technical colleges, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, a voluntary professional association of vocational educators, and representatives from business, labor, and industry.

(2) The workforce training and education coordinating board shall establish a planning committee to develop the criteria for screening and selecting the students who will receive the award. This criteria shall include but not be limited to the following characteristics: Proficiency in their chosen fields, attendance, attitude, character, leadership, and civic contributions.

[ 1995 1st sp.s. c 7 s 3; 1987 c 231 s 2; 1984 c 267 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—1995 1st sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 28C.04.520.